New York, session 2025-2026, A7620.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 895-b of the general municipal law, as added by 2 chapter 535 of the laws of 1971, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 895-b. Tompkins county industrial development agency. For the bene- 4 fit of the county of Tompkins and the inhabitants thereof, an industrial 5 development agency, to be known as the TOMPKINS COUNTY INDUSTRIAL DEVEL- 6 OPMENT AGENCY, is hereby established for the accomplishment of any or 7 all of the purposes specified in title one of article eighteen-A of this 8 chapter. It shall constitute a body corporate and politic, and be 9 perpetual in duration. It shall have the powers and duties now or here- 10 after conferred by title one of article eighteen-A of this chapter upon 11 industrial development agencies and, provided however, that the exercise 12 of the powers by such agency with respect to the acquisition of real 13 property whether by purchase, condemnation or otherwise, shall be 14 subject to the local zoning and planning regulations and shall take into 15 consideration the regional and local comprehensive land use plans. It 16 shall be organized in a manner prescribed by and be subject to the 17 provisions of title one of article eighteen-A of this chapter. Its 18 members shall be appointed by the governing body of the county of Tomp- 19 kins. The agency, its members, officers and employees and its operations 20 and activities shall in all respects be governed by the provisions of 21 title one of article eighteen-A of this chapter provided, however, that 22 notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision two of section eight 23 hundred fifty-six of this chapter requiring a municipal industrial 24 development agency to consist of no more than seven members, the Tomp- 25 kins county legislature is hereby authorized to appoint nine members to 26 the county of Tompkins industrial development agency. 27 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10730-01-5